Utah statutes.
58-69-302.5.   Licensing of dentist-educators.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Foreign country" means a country other than the United States, its territories, or Canada.

(b)  "Foreign dental school" means a dental school that is outside the United States, its territories, and Canada.

(c)  "Specialty area" means:

(i)  an area of dentistry proposed in a formal application by a sponsoring organization to the Council on Dental Education and Licensure and formally approved by the American Dental Association as meeting the requirements for recognition of dental specialist; and

(ii)  a university program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation that offers an examination leading to board certification.

(2)  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an individual may receive a dentist educator license if the individual:

(a)  submits an application in a form prescribed by the division, which may include:

(i)  submission by the applicant of information maintained in a practitioner data bank, as designated by division rule, with respect to the applicant; and

(ii)  a record of professional liability claims made against the applicant and settlements paid by or on behalf of the applicant;

(b)  provides:

(i)  a certificate of successful completion of an advanced educational program in a specialty area that is two or more years in length; and

(ii)  proof that the applicant passed Part I and Part II of the National Board Dental Examinations or its equivalent as determined by the division in collaboration with the Board of Dentistry;

(c)  is licensed in good standing in a foreign country, the United States, its territories, or Canada;

(d)  does not have an investigation or action pending against a professional license in any jurisdiction, unless:

(i)  the license was subsequently reinstated in good standing; or

(ii)  the division in collaboration with the board determines to its satisfaction, after full disclosure by the applicant and full consideration by the division in collaboration with the board, that:

(A)  the conduct has been corrected, monitored, and resolved; or

(B)  a mitigating circumstance exists that prevents resolution, and the division in collaboration with the board is satisfied that, but for the mitigating circumstance, the license would be reinstated;

(e)  submits documentation of legal status to work in the United States;

(f)  is of good moral character;

(g)  is able to read, write, speak, understand, and be understood in the English language and demonstrates proficiency to the satisfaction of the division in collaboration with the board, if requested;

(h)  is appointed to the faculty of an accredited dental school in Utah to serve as a member of the dental school's academic faculty, as evidenced by written certification from the dean of the dental school, stating that the applicant:

(i)  is qualified by knowledge, skill, and ability to practice dentistry in the state; and

(ii)  will be under the supervision of the academic administration of the accredited dental school and will be permitted to practice dentistry only as a necessary part of the applicant's duties, providing detailed evidence of the applicant's qualifications and competence, including the nature and location of the applicant's proposed responsibilities, reasons for any limitations of the applicant's practice responsibilities, and the degree of supervision, if any, under which the applicant will function; and

(i)  pays a licensing fee set by the division under Section 63J-1-504.

(3) (a)  A license as a dentist educator is valid until the earlier of:

(i)  two years from the date the license is issued;

(ii)  the date of termination of employment with the dental school; or

(iii)  failure to maintain any of the requirements of this section.

(b)  The dentist educator's license only authorizes the dentist educator to practice dentistry in the state as an educator at the dental school that employs the dentist educator and its affiliated facilities.  The dentist educator shall follow Section 58-1-501.6 when making any representations to the public.

(4)  The division or the board may require an applicant for licensure under this section to meet with the board and representatives of the division for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for licensure.

(5)  The division in collaboration with the board may withdraw a license under this section at any time for material misrepresentation or unlawful or unprofessional conduct.

